Kentucky statutes. TITLE V Military Affairs
Emergency Response Commission

39.800.
Kentucky Emergency Response Commission established — General purposes. [Repealed.]

39.805.
Definitions. [Repealed.]

39.810.
Membership — Meetings — Reimbursement for meetings. [Repealed.]

39.815.
Duties of commission — Appointment of local committees mandatory. [Repealed.]

39.817.
Fees — Trust and agency account. [Repealed.]

39.820.
Permissive activities of commission. [Repealed.]

39.825.
Administrative support by Division of Disaster and Emergency Services — Protection of federal funds — Issuance of administrative regulations. [Repealed.]

39.830.
Local planning district boundaries. [Repealed.]

39.835.
Local emergency planning committees — Relationship to state commission. [Repealed.]

39.840.
Duties of local emergency planning committees — Terms of members — Enforcement procedures. [Repealed.]

39.845.
Identification of covered facilities — Reporting to public agencies. [Repealed.]

39.850.
Naming of facility representative — Liaison duties. [Repealed.]

39.855.
Organizations required to participate in local planning process — Adoption of local ordinances. [Repealed.]

39.860.
Plan development, approval and review. [Repealed.]

39.865.
Response to be consistent with plan. [Repealed.]

39.870.
State agency response. [Repealed.]

39.875.
Claims to be filed with Board of Claims. [Repealed.]

39.880.
Report of release of substance. [Repealed.]

39.885.
Establishment of warning and notification standards. [Repealed.]

39.890.
Report of inventories and locations of extremely hazardous substances. [Repealed.]

39.895.
Additional information may be required. [Repealed.]

39.900.
Reports available to public — Protection of trade secrets. [Repealed.]

39.905.
KRS 39.800 to 39.905 supplemental to other laws. [Repealed.]